Utah statutes.
49-23-201.   System membership -- Eligibility.

(1)  Beginning July 1, 2011, a participating employer that employs public safety service employees or firefighter service employees shall participate in this system.

(2) (a)  A public safety service employee or a firefighter service employee initially entering employment with a participating employer on or after July 1, 2011, is eligible:

(i)  as a member for service credit and defined contributions under the Tier II hybrid retirement system established by Part 3, Tier II Hybrid Retirement System; or

(ii)  as a participant for defined contributions under the Tier II defined contributions plan established by Part 4, Tier II Defined Contribution Plan.

(b)  A public safety service employee or a firefighter service employee initially entering employment with a participating employer on or after July 1, 2011, shall:

(i)  make an election to participate in the system created under this chapter within 30 days from the date of eligibility for accrual of benefits:

(A)  as a member for service credit and defined contributions under the Tier II hybrid retirement system established by Part 3, Tier II Hybrid Retirement System; or

(B)  as a participant for defined contributions under the Tier II defined contribution plan established by Part 4, Tier II Defined Contribution Plan; and

(ii)  electronically submit to the office notification of the member's election under Subsection (2)(b)(i) in a manner approved by the office.

(c)  An election made by a public safety service employee or firefighter service employee initially entering employment with a participating employer under this Subsection (2) is irrevocable beginning one year from the date of eligibility for accrual of benefits.

(d)  If no election is made under Subsection (2)(b)(i), the public safety service employee or firefighter service employee shall become a member eligible for service credit and defined contributions under the Tier II hybrid retirement system established by Part 3, Tier II Hybrid Retirement System.



Amended by Chapter 439, 2011 General Session

